Georgia, session 2025_26, HB343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 343
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0465
17 SECTION 1.
18 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Living Wage Act."
19 SECTION 2.
20 Title 34 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to labor and industrial relations,
21 is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
22 "34-4-1.1.
23 (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that it is good public policy, and in the
24 interest of all Georgians, to guarantee a living wage for all workers. The General
25 Assembly more specifically finds and declares that a living wage enables Georgians to
26 provide for themselves and their families without having to sacrifice basic needs.
27 Furthermore, a living wage will increase consumption and allow Georgians to pay their
28 bills on time, which benefits our economy and businesses.
29 (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that this chapter shall be broadly construed to
30 give substantial effect to the minimum wage requirements provided herein as a living wage
31 for all Georgians and that any exceptions to the minimum wage requirements that may be
32 found in this Code shall be interpreted narrowly, so as not to impair the broad construction
33 of this chapter."
34 SECTION 3.
35 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 34-4-3, relating to amount of
36 minimum wage to be paid by employers and the employers and employees covered by
37 chapter, as follows:
38 "34-4-3.
39 (a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, every employer, whether a
40 person, firm, or corporation, shall pay to all covered employees a minimum wage which
41 shall be not less than $5.15 $20.00 per hour for each hour worked in the employment of
H. B. 343
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0465
42 such employer. For purposes of determining whether an employer has paid an employee
43 the minimum wage, no gratuities, tips, or other forms of voluntary payments paid to such
44 employee by third parties shall count or otherwise be credited toward the wages paid to
45 such employee by such employer.
46 (2)(A) On January 1, 2027, and on January 1 of each successive year thereafter, the
47 minimum wage shall be adjusted upwards to reflect the increase in the cost of living,
48 if any, as determined by the Georgia Department of Labor pursuant to subparagraph (B)
49 of this paragraph.
50 (B) On September 30, 2026, and on September 30 of each successive year thereafter,
51 the Georgia Department of Labor shall measure the increase in the cost of living as
52 being the percentage increase as of the preceding July over the July level of the
53 immediately preceding year according to the Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage
54 Earners and Clerical Workers or such successor index as published by the United States
55 Department of Labor or its successor agency.
56 (C) Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this
57 paragraph shall be published on or before November 1 and shall take effect on the
58 following January 1.
59 (b) This chapter shall not apply with respect to any employer whose sole employee is the
60 sole owner or sole proprietor of such employer:
61 (1) Any employer that has sales of $40,000.00 per year or less;
62 (2) Any employer having five employees or less;
63 (3) Any employer of domestic employees;
64 (4) Any employer who is a farm owner, sharecropper, or land renter;
65 (5) Any employee whose compensation consists wholly or partially of gratuities;
66 (6) Any employee who is a high school or college student;
67 (7) Any individual who is employed as a newspaper carrier; or
H. B. 343
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0465
68 (8) Any individual who is employed by a nonprofit child-caring institution or long-term
69 care facility serving children or mentally disabled adults who are enrolled in such
70 institution and reside in residential facilities of the institution, if such employee resides
71 in such facilities, receives without cost board and lodging from such institution, and is
72 compensated on a cash basis at an annual rate of not less than $10,000.00.
73 (c) This chapter shall not apply to any employer who is subject to the minimum wage
74 provisions of any act of Congress as to employees covered thereby if such act of Congress
75 provides for a minimum wage which is greater than the minimum wage which is provided
76 for in this Code section."
77 SECTION 4.
78 Said title is further amended by repealing in its entirety Code Section 34-4-3.1, relating to
79 wages, employment benefits, and scheduling by local government entities.
80 SECTION 5.
81 Said title is further amended by repealing in its entirety Code Section 34-4-4, relating to
82 authority of Commissioner to grant exceptions from operation of chapter, and designating
83 said Code section as reserved.
84 SECTION 6.
85 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 34-4-6, relating to action to recover
86 difference where employee paid less than minimum wage, as follows:
87 "34-4-6.
88 (a) If any employer pays any employee a lesser amount than the minimum wage provided
89 in this chapter, the employee, at any time within three years, may bring a civil action in
90 superior court for the recovery of the difference between the amount paid and the minimum
91 wage provided in this chapter, plus an additional amount equal to the original claim, which
H. B. 343
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0465
92 shall be allowed as liquidated damages, together with costs and such reasonable attorney's
93 fees as may be allowed by the court. No contract or agreement between any employer and
94 his or her employees nor any acceptance of a lesser wage by any employee shall bar the
95 ability of an employee to bring an action under this subsection.
96 (b)(1) As used in this subsection, the term 'retaliate' or 'retaliation' means and refers to
97 the discharge, suspension, demotion, or any other adverse employment action taken as
98 to the terms or conditions of employment.
99 (2) No employer shall retaliate against an employee for such employee bringing an
100 action against such employer for recovery of wages pursuant to subsection (a) of this
101 Code section or otherwise seeking recovery of unpaid wages from such employer. Any
102 employer who retaliates against an employee in violation of this paragraph shall be guilty
103 of a misdemeanor.
104 (3) An employee who has been the object of retaliation in violation of this paragraph
105 may institute a civil action in superior court for relief as set forth in paragraph (4) of this
106 subsection within one year after discovering the retaliation or within three years after the
107 retaliation, whichever is earlier.
108 (4) In any civil action brought pursuant to this subsection, the court may order any or all
109 of the following relief:
110 (A) An injunction restraining continued violation of paragraph (2) of this subsection;
111 (B) Reinstatement of the employee to the same position held before the retaliation or
112 to an equivalent position;
113 (C) Reinstatement of full fringe benefits and seniority rights;
114 (D) Compensation for lost wages, benefits, and other remuneration;
115 (E) Any other compensatory damages allowable at law; or
116 (F) Punitive damages.
H. B. 343
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0465
117 (5) In any civil action brought pursuant to this subsection, the question of damages shall
118 be determined by the jury and the court shall award reasonable attorney's fees, court
119 costs, and expenses to a prevailing employee."
120 SECTION 7.
121 Said title is further amended in Code Section 34-6A-4, relating to prohibited discriminatory
122 activities, by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
123 "(a.1) No employer shall utilize a certificate issued by the United States Department of
124 Labor pursuant to 29 U.S.C. Section 214(c) to pay individuals with disabilities who are
125 employed by such employer less than the minimum wage required to be paid by employers
126 to employees under federal law."
127 SECTION 8.
128 Title 42 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to penal institutions, is amended
129 in Code Section 42-5-59, relating to employment of inmates in the local community, by
130 revising subsection (b) as follows:
131 "(b) An inmate authorized to work at paid employment in the community under
132 subsection (a) of this Code section shall be paid for any labor provided at the market wage
133 comparable to that which would be paid to a person who is not incarcerated, which shall
134 in no event be less than the minimum wage required to be paid to employees under Code
135 Section 34-4-3, and shall comply with all rules and regulations promulgated by the board
136 relative to the handling, disbursement, and holding in trust of all funds earned by the
137 inmate while under the jurisdiction of the department. An amount determined to be the
138 cost of the inmate's keep and confinement shall be deducted from the earnings of each
139 inmate, and such amount shall be deposited in the treasury of the department; provided,
140 however, that, if the inmate is assigned to a county correctional institution, the deducted
141 amount shall be deposited in the treasury of the county to which the inmate is assigned.
H. B. 343
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0465
142 After the deduction for keep and confinement, the With respect to such wages, the
143 commissioner shall:
144 (1) Allow the inmate to draw from the balance a reasonable sum to cover his incidental
145 expenses;
146 (2) Retain to the inmate's credit an amount as is deemed necessary to accumulate a
147 reasonable sum to be paid to him on his release from the penal institution;
148 (3) Deduct from the inmate's funds any amounts amount necessary to cover the costs of
149 medical or dental attention provided to the inmate, said. Such deductions to shall be
150 made in accordance with policies and procedures promulgated by the commissioner;
151 provided, however, that no deductions shall be made under this paragraph if such
152 deductions would cause the inmate to receive less than the minimum wage required to be
153 paid to employees under Code Section 34-4-3; and
154 (4) Cause to be paid any additional balance as is needed for the support of the inmate's
155 dependents."
156 SECTION 9.
157 Said title is further amended in Code Section 42-5-60, relating to hiring out of inmates,
158 participation of inmates in programs of volunteer service, sale of products produced by
159 inmates, disposition of proceeds, and payment to inmates for services, by revising subsection
160 (c) as follows:
161 "(c) Funds arising from the sale of goods or other products manufactured or produced by
162 any state correctional institution operated by the department shall be deposited with the
163 treasury of the department. The funds arising from the sale of goods and products
164 produced in a county correctional institution or from the hiring out of inmates shall be
165 placed in the treasury or depository of the county, as the case may be. The department is
166 authorized shall, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board, to pay
167 compensation of not more less than $25.00 per month the market wage comparable to that
H. B. 343
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0465
168 which would be paid to a person who is not incarcerated, which shall in no event be less
169 than the minimum wage required to be paid to employees under Code Section 34-4-3, from
170 funds available to the department to each inmate employed in any industry."
171 SECTION 10.
172 Said title is further amended in Code Section 42-5-120, relating to rules and regulations and
173 requirements, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
174 "(b) The rules and regulations for the work programs authorized by this article shall
175 include but not be limited to rules requiring:
176 (1) Assurance that inmates' work is voluntary and that there shall be no retribution
177 against inmates who do not volunteer;
178 (2) Payment of inmates at wages at a rate not less than that paid for work of a similar
179 nature in the locality in which the work is to be performed, which shall in no event be less
180 than the minimum wage required to be paid to employees under Code Section 34-4-3;
181 (3) Provision of federal and state governmental benefits to participating inmates
182 comparable to governmental benefits provided for similarly situated private sector
183 employees;
184 (4) Selection of participating inmates with careful attention to security issues;
185 (5) Appropriate supervision of inmates during travel and employment outside the
186 correctional institution;
187 (6) Assurance that inmate labor will not result in the displacement of employed workers;
188 be applied in skills, crafts, or trades in which there is a surplus of available gainful labor
189 in the locality; or impair existing contracts for services;
190 (7) Consultations with local private businesses that may be economically impacted;
191 (8) Consultations with local labor union organizations and other local employee groups,
192 especially those who have an interest in the trade or skill to be performed by the inmates;
193 and
H. B. 343
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0465
194 (9) Procedures for deductions from inmate wages for federal, state, and local taxes;
195 reasonable charges for room and board; court-ordered child support and voluntary family
196 support; and payments to the Georgia Crime Victims Emergency Fund of not less than
197 5 percent nor greater than 20 percent of gross wages, in compliance with Prison Industry
198 Enhancement Certification Program requirements."
199 SECTION 11.
200 This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
201 SECTION 12.
202 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 343
- 9 -